Massachusetts, session 194th, H4347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 78 of the general laws or of any other general or
special law or charter provision of the town of Williamstown to the contrary, the terms of office
for the board of library trustees for the town of Williamstown shall be staggered as follows:
of the four library trustee terms that are up for election in 2028, one of these terms to be
chosen by the select board shall be reelected for a one-time term of two years in order to align
with the single trustee term that is up for election in 2030, and thereafter, shall resume being a
three-year turstee term up for election in 20230;
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1